District of Columbia statutes.
42-812

Equity practice followed where answer sets up defense against foreclosure.

If matter of defense against the foreclosure of said mortgage or the enforcement of said deed of trust be set up in answer to said rule, the further proceedings shall be according to the practice in equity after answer filed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1273, ch. 854, § 535
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-263,§ 1601, 48 DCR 991
May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 602(b), 49 DCR 2551
1981 Ed., § 45-712.
1973 Ed., § 45-612.
D.C. Law 14-132 revived this section as of November 6, 2001. This section had been previously repealed by D.C. Law 13-263, § 1601.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-86, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2991).
Section 2 of Act 14-188, the “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Emergency Amendment Act”, deemed approved Nov. 27, 2001, without the signature of the Mayor, provided that D.C. Law 13-263 shall not apply beginning November 6, 2001, through March 6, 2002.
For temporary (90 day) revival of section, see § 403(b) of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).